Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1724
Stipend.

The commission shall pay a stipend to qualified design-builders that submit responsive proposals but are not selected. Payment of the stipend shall give the commission ownership of the intellectual property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts. The amount of the stipend shall be at the discretion of the commission. The refusal to pay or accept the stipend shall leave the intellectual property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts in the possession of the creator of the proposals and alternative technical concepts.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 25.